Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.08.410

Duties of officers.

Each officer has the authority and shall perform the duties set forth in the bylaws or, to the extent consistent with the bylaws, the duties prescribed by the board of directors or by an officer authorized by the board of directors to prescribe the duties of other officers.

[ 1989 c 165 s 101.]